Kentucky statutes. 
Kentucky New Sections Added by Recent Legislation

10/01/2020 05:17PM FROM_EDEN_\\fabwebd5\data\EDEN_Prod\shared\ProductBuild\FolioOutput_KYCODE_1-1601586964459

10/01/2020 05:17PM Pete_NFO_build

10/06/2020 02:00AM Pete_NFO_build

2020/10/06 22:08:33 IET005-ChkNukSliceNFO Validate links, remove links

10/06/2020 10:18PM Pete_CheckNuke_4xNFO_build